New York, session 2025-2026, S9452.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 6 of chapter 63 of the laws of 2021 amending the 2 environmental conservation law relating to supermarkets providing excess 3 edible food to food relief organizations, as amended by chapter 791 of 4 the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 5 § 6. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however that 6 sections one, two, three and four of this act shall take effect on the 7 same date and in the same manner as chapter 352 of the laws of 2020 8 takes effect, provided, further, that section four of this act shall 9 expire and be deemed repealed on December 31, [2026] 2031. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15035-01-6